Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.103.020

Program established—Powers and duties of office.

Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington national guard postsecondary education grant program is established. The program shall be administered by the office. In administering the program, the powers and duties of the office shall include, but need not be limited to:

(1) With the assistance of the Washington military department, the selection of eligible students to receive the grant as follows:

(a) An eligible student may receive a grant under this section to help pay for postsecondary education program costs as approved by the office. Grants may not:

(i) Exceed the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, plus $500 for books and supplies;

(ii) Exceed the participant's cost of attendance, when combined with all other public and private grants, scholarships, and waiver assistance the participant receives; and

(iii) Result in reduction of a participant's federal or other state financial aid.

(b) The Washington military department shall ensure that data needed to identify eligible students are promptly transmitted to the office.

(c) The annual amount of each grant may vary, but may not exceed the annual cost of undergraduate tuition fees and services and activities fees at the University of Washington, plus an allowance for books and supplies.

(d) The maximum benefit a single guard member, or a combination of the guard member and the guard member's designated spouse or dependents, may receive may not extend beyond six full-time years, or the credit or clock-hour equivalent;

(2) The award of grants funded by federal and state funds, private donations, or repayments from any participant who does not complete the participant's service obligation;

(3) The adoption of necessary rules and policies, including establishing a priority for eligible students attending an institution of higher education located in this state that is accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges;

(4) The adoption of participant selection criteria. The criteria may include but need not be limited to requirements for: Satisfactory academic progress, enrollment in courses or programs that lead to a baccalaureate degree or an associate degree or a certificate, and satisfactory participation as a member of the Washington national guard;

(5) With the assistance of the Washington military department, the notification of members of their additional service obligation or required repayment of the grant; and

(6) The collection of repayments from members who do not meet the service obligations.

[ 2024 c 178 s 2; 2022 c 68 s 2; 2020 c 297 s 2; 2006 c 71 s 2; 1994 c 234 s 6.]